Hawaii statutes.
[§353-12.5] Public assistance; inmates;
monthly reports to department of human services. Beginning January 31,
2010, to assist the department of human services to enforce section 346-29(b),
the director shall prepare and transmit to the department of human services
monthly reports listing all inmates newly admitted during the previous month to
any correctional facility within the State; provided that no later than
December 31, 2009, the director shall transmit to the department of human
services an initial list of all inmates within the department of public
safety's correctional facilities statewide. [L 2009, c 188, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next